Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2505.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3107-C(k) of the act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code, is amended to read:Section 3107-C. Charter Limitations.--* * *[(k) No county shall enact any ordinance or take any other action dealing with the regulation of the transfer, ownership, transportation or possession of firearms.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516